Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1536.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1221. Career and Technical Administrative Director Certification Flexibility.--(a) An educator who has been issued a superintendent's letter of eligibility may be employed as a director of career and technical education if the educator meets the following requirements for a career and technical administrative director certification:(1) Has a minimum of three (3) years of relevant professional experience in a career and technical education 1234567891011121314151617181920 school or administering a school district, intermediate unit or high school offering its own approved career and technical education program.(2) Completed a program of graduate study or an approved alternative program under section 1207.1 that prepares the educator to direct, operate, supervise and administer the organization and educational activities of a school district or career and technical school or department.(b) The Department of Education may not impose a requirement based on the amount of time or percentage of the assignment related to supervising career and technical education programs.(c) The period of employment as a career and technical education administrative director under a valid Pennsylvania career and technical emergency permit shall be counted by the Department of Education toward fulfilling the relevant professional experience requirement under subsection (a)(1).Section 2. Any regulation inconsistent with this act is abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1536PN1799 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819